Florida, session 2026, SB598.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 43 44 Section 1.âSubsection (6) is added to section 497.164, 45 Florida Statutes, to read: 46 497.164âSolicitation of goods or services.â 47 (6)âA licensee under this chapter may not enter into a 48 contract, agreement, or other arrangement in which such licensee 49 or any affiliated licensee becomes the exclusive or sole 50 provider of funeral, cremation, refrigeration, or removal 51 services for any entity that provides medical, palliative, or 52 other end-of-life care and services to the general public. 53 Section 2.âParagraph (g) of subsection (2) of section 54 497.263, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 55 497.263âCemetery companies; license required; licensure 56 requirements and procedures.â 57 (2)âAPPLICATION PROCEDURES.â 58 (g)âThe proposed cemetery must contain at least 30 59 contiguous acres. Such acreage must be contiguous, except that 60 parcels of land divided solely by a public right-of-way or 61 public road may be considered contiguous, provided the parcels 62 are in close geographic proximity and form a unified cemetery 63 property. The application must state the exact number of acres 64 in the proposed cemetery and must identify any public rights-of 65 way or roads dividing the parcels. Parcels located in separate 66 or distant geographic areas, even if along the same roadway or 67 corridor, do not satisfy the contiguity requirement of this 68 paragraph The application shall state the exact number of acres 69 in the proposed cemetery. 70 Section 3.âSubsection (2) of section 497.270, Florida 71 Statutes, is amended to read: 72 497.270âMinimum acreage; sale or disposition of cemetery 73 lands.â 74 (2)âAny lands owned by a licensee and dedicated for use by 75 it as a cemetery, which meet the criteria set forth in s. 76 497.263(2)(g) are in excess of a minimum of 30 contiguous acres, 77 may be sold, conveyed, or disposed of by the licensee, after 78 obtaining written approval pursuant to procedures and using 79 utilizing forms specified by rule and consistent with subsection 80 (3), for use by the new owner for other purposes than as a 81 cemetery. All of the human remains which have been previously 82 interred therein must shall first be have been removed from the 83 lands proposed to be sold, conveyed, or disposed of; however, 84 the provisions of ss. 497.152(8)(e) and 497.384 must be complied 85 with before prior to any disinterment of human remains. Any and 86 All titles, interests, or burial rights which may have been sold 87 or contracted to be sold in lands which are the subject of the 88 sale must shall be conveyed to and revested in the licensee 89 before prior to consummation of any such sale, conveyance, or 90 disposition. 91 Section 4.âSubsection (4) of section 497.369, Florida 92 Statutes, is amended to read: 93 497.369âEmbalmers; licensure as an embalmer by endorsement; 94 licensure of a temporary embalmer.â 95 (4)âEach applicant for licensure by endorsement shall must 96 pass the examination on local, state, and federal laws and rules 97 relating to the disposition of dead human bodies which is 98 required under s. 497.368 and which shall be given by the 99 licensing authority. Licensure by endorsement under subparagraph 100 (1)(b)1. does not require any educational or testing 101 requirements other than those required in this subsection. 102 Section 5.âSubsection (4) of section 497.374, Florida 103 Statutes, is amended to read: 104 497.374âFuneral directing; licensure as a funeral director 105 by endorsement; licensure of a temporary funeral director.â 106 (4)âEach applicant for licensure by endorsement shall must 107 pass the examination on local, state, and federal laws and rules 108 relating to the disposition of dead human bodies which is 109 required under s. 497.373 and which shall be given by the 110 licensing authority. Licensure by endorsement under subparagraph 111 (1)(b)1. does not require education or testing requirements 112 other than those required in s. 497.373(2)(b). 113 Section 6.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 114 497.375, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 115 497.375âFuneral directing; licensure of a funeral director 116 intern.â 117 (1) 118 (b)1.âExcept as provided in subparagraph 2., an applicant 119 must hold the educational credentials required for licensure of 120 a funeral director under s. 497.373(1)(d). 121 2.âAn applicant who has not completed the educational 122 credentials required for a funeral director license is eligible 123 for licensure as a funeral director intern if the applicant: 124 a.âHolds an associate degree or higher in any field from a 125 college or university accredited by a regional accrediting 126 agency recognized by the United States Department of Education. 127 b.âIs currently enrolled in and attending a licensing 128 authority-approved course of study in mortuary science or 129 funeral service arts required for licensure of a funeral 130 director under s. 497.373(1)(d)2. 131 c.âHas taken and received a passing grade in a college 132 credit course in mortuary law or funeral service law and has 133 taken and received a passing grade in a college credit course in 134 ethics. 135 Section 7.âSubsection (3) is added to section 497.376, 136 Florida Statutes, to read: 137 497.376âLicense as funeral director and embalmer 138 permitted.â 139 (3)âAn applicant for a combination license by endorsement 140 as a funeral director and embalmer under s. 497.373 and s. 141 497.369, respectively, is not required to meet any educational 142 or testing requirements other than those in ss. 497.373(2)(b) 143 and 497.369(4). 144 Section 8.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 145 497.377, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 146 497.377âCombination funeral director and embalmer 147 internships.â 148 (2)(a)âAn applicant who has not completed the educational 149 credentials required for a combination license as both funeral 150 director and embalmer is eligible for licensure as a combination 151 funeral director and embalmer intern if the applicant: 152 1.âHolds an associate degree or higher in any field from a 153 college or university accredited by a regional accrediting 154 agency recognized by the United States Department of Education; 155 or 156 2.âIs currently enrolled in and attending a college 157 accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education 158 (ABFSE) in a course of study in mortuary science accredited by 159 ABFSE. 160 2.âHas completed at least 75 percent of the course of study 161 in mortuary science as certified by the college in which the 162 applicant is currently enrolled. 163 3.âHas taken and received a passing grade in a college 164 credit course in mortuary law or funeral service law and has 165 taken and received a passing grade in a college credit course in 166 ethics. 167 Section 9.âPresent subsections (6) and (7) of section 168 497.386, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (7) 169 and (8), respectively, and a new subsection (6) is added to that 170 section, to read: 171 497.386âStorage, preservation, and transportation of human 172 remains.â 173 (6)âIf any human remains have been in the lawful possession 174 of any licensee or licensed facility for 90 days or more, and 175 the legally authorized person of the decedent fails, neglects, 176 or refuses to direct the disposition, the licensee or licensed 177 facility may dispose of the human remains. 178 Section 10.âParagraph (b) of subsection (7) of section 179 497.459, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 180 497.459âCancellation of, or default on, preneed contracts; 181 required notice.â 182 (7)âNOTICE TO PURCHASER OR LEGALLY AUTHORIZED PERSON.â 183 (b)1.âThe notice in paragraph (a) must be provided by 184 certified mail, registered mail, or permitted delivery service, 185 return receipt requested, to the last known e-mail or mailing 186 address of the purchaser or the beneficiaryâs legally authorized 187 person, whichever is applicable, as provided to the preneed 188 licensee. If the notice is returned as undeliverable within 30 189 calendar days after the preneed licensee sent the notice, the 190 trustee must shall perform a diligent search and inquiry to 191 obtain a different e-mail or mailing address for the purchaser 192 or the beneficiaryâs legally authorized person, whichever is 193 applicable. The board may adopt rules to implement this 194 subparagraph For purposes of this subparagraph, any address 195 known and used by the purchaser or the beneficiaryâs legally 196 authorized person, whichever is applicable, for sending regular 197 mailings or other communications from the purchaser or the 198 beneficiaryâs legally authorized person, whichever is 199 applicable, to the preneed licensee or any address produced 200 through a current address service or searchable database shall 201 be included with other addresses produced from the diligent 202 search and inquiry, if any. If the trusteeâs diligent search and 203 inquiry produces an address different from the notice address, 204 the trustee shall mail a copy of the notice by certified mail, 205 registered mail, or permitted delivery service, return receipt 206 requested, to any and all addresses produced as a result of the 207 diligent search and inquiry. 208 2.âIf the purchaser or the beneficiaryâs legally authorized 209 person, whichever is applicable, fails to respond to such notice 210 within 120 days after delivery of the last mailed notice under 211 subparagraph 1., the funds held in trust must be distributed in 212 accordance with the terms of the preneed contract, the trust 213 agreement, and any applicable provisions of chapter 717. 214 Section 11.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 215 497.607, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 216 497.607âCremation; procedure required.â 217 (3)(a)âWith respect to any person who intends to provide 218 for the cremation of the deceased, if, after 90 a period of 120 219 days from the time of cremation the cremated remains have not 220 been claimed, the funeral or direct disposal establishment may 221 dispose of the cremated remains. Such disposal includes shall 222 include scattering them at sea or placing them in a licensed 223 cemetery scattering garden or pond or in a church columbarium or 224 otherwise disposing of the remains as provided by rule. 225 Section 12.âSubsection (5) of section 627.404, Florida 226 Statutes, is amended to read: 227 627.404âInsurable interest; personal insurance.â 228 (5)âA contract of insurance upon a person, other than a 229 policy of prepaid funeral contract, group life insurance or 230 group or blanket accident, health, or disability insurance, may 231 not be carried out effectuated unless, on or before the time of 232 entering into such contract, the person insured, having legal 233 capacity to contract, applies for or consents in writing to the 234 contract and its terms, except that any person having an 235 insurable interest in the life of a minor younger than 15 years 236 of age or any person upon whom a minor younger than 15 years of 237 age is dependent for support and maintenance may obtain 238 effectuate a policy of insurance on the minor. 239 Section 13.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 240 made by this act to section 497.263, Florida Statutes, in a 241 reference thereto, subsection (5) of section 497.260, Florida 242 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 243 497.260âCemeteries; exemption; investigation and 244 mediation.â 245 (5)âAny religious-institution-owned cemetery exempt under 246 subsection (1), except those cemeteries qualifying under 247 paragraph (1)(d), which becomes affiliated with a commercial 248 enterprise must meet the requirements of s. 497.263. 249 Section 14.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.